Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.360

Application of Title 23B RCW.

The provisions of Title 23B RCW shall apply to the associations subject to this chapter, except where such provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter. The terms "shareholder" or "shareholders" as used in Title 23B RCW, or in chapter 24.06 RCW as incorporated by reference herein, shall be deemed to refer to "member" or "members" as defined in this chapter. When the terms "share" or "shares" are used with reference to voting rights in Title 23B RCW, or in chapter 24.06 RCW as incorporated by reference herein, such terms shall be deemed to refer to the vote or votes entitled to be cast by a member or members.

[ 1991 c 72 s 23; 1989 c 307 s 32.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.